Florida, session 2026, HB6013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Part IV of chapter 760, Florida Statutes,
consisting of s. 760.80, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Section 2. Part V of chapter 760, Florida Statutes,
consisting of s. 760.854, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Section 3. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
1001.216, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1001.216 Council on the Social Status of Black Men and
Boys.—
(1) The Council on the Social Status of Black Men and Boys
is established within Florida Memorial University and shall be
composed of 19 members appointed as follows:
(k) A businessperson who is an African American, as
defined in s. 760.80(2)(a), appointed by the Governor.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6013 2026
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6013-00